Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0471.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4a. (1) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, $13,000,000.00 is appropriated from the general fund to the behavioral threat assessment and management program fund created under subsection (2). (2) The behavioral threat assessment and management program fund is created in the department of treasury. (3) The department is the administrator of the behavioral threat assessment and management program fund for auditing purposes. (4) The state treasurer may receive money from any source for deposit into the behavioral threat assessment and management program fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. Money from grants or gifts received for the purposes described in section 4 must be deposited into the fund and used for the purposes described in section 4. (5) Money in the behavioral threat assessment and management program fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the behavioral threat assessment and management program fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (6) The department shall use the money in the behavioral threat assessment and management program fund, including the interest and earnings, solely for the purposes described in section 4. (7) The department shall ensure that funds expended for the behavioral threat assessment and management program are used to comply with the requirements of section 4 and are used consistent with state law and department policy to most efficiently and effectively comply with this act. (8) The appropriation authorized under this section is a work project appropriation and any unencumbered or unallotted funds are carried forward into the following fiscal year. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the work project is to develop, implement, manage, and maintain the behavioral threat assessment and management program created under section 4. (b) The work project will be accomplished through the use of state employees or contracts, or both. (c) The total estimated completion cost of the work project is $13,000,000.00. (d) The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2026. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02605'25) or House Bill No. ____ (request no. H02605'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.